District of Columbia statutes.
31-3519

Reports to directors and trustees.

The officers or other management of a corporation issued a certificate of authority under this chapter shall report to its board of directors or trustees, no less often than quarterly, regarding any and all transactions or events that have, or are likely to have, a material impact on the operations or financial condition of the corporation.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 20, 44 DCR 1158
1981 Ed., § 35-4719.